Vermont, session 2025-2026, S100.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1251 is amended to read:
§ 1251. DEFINITIONS
Whenever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning
clearly appears from the context:
* * *
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 2 of 21
(3) “Discharge” means the placing, depositing, or emission of any
wastes or pollutants, directly or indirectly, into an injection well or into the
waters of the State.
* * *
(11) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or his or her
authorized representative.
(12) “Waste” means effluent, sewage, or any substance or material,
liquid, gaseous, solid, or radioactive, including heated liquids, whether or not
harmful or deleterious to waters; provided, however, the term “sewage” as
used in this chapter shall not include the rinse or process water from a cheese
manufacturing process.
(13) “Waters” includes all rivers, streams, creeks, brooks, reservoirs,
ponds, lakes, springs, and all artificial or natural bodies of surface waters,
artificial or natural, that are contained within, flow through, or border upon the
State or any portion of it.
* * *
(20) “Continuous discharge” means a discharge that occurs without
interruption throughout the operating hours of the facility, except for
infrequent shutdowns for maintenance, process changes, or other similar
activities.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 3 of 21
(21) “Daily discharge” means the discharge of a pollutant measured
during a calendar day or any 24-hour period that reasonably represents the
calendar day for purposes of sampling. For pollutants with limitations
expressed in units of mass, the daily discharge is calculated as the total mass of
the pollutant discharged over the day. For pollutants with limitations
expressed in other units of measurement, the daily discharge is calculated as
the average measurement of the pollutant over the day.
(22) “Pollutant” means dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue,
sewage, garbage, sewage sludge, munitions, chemical wastes, biological
materials, radioactive materials, heat, wrecked or discarded equipment, rock,
sand, cellar dirt and industrial, municipal, and agricultural waste discharged
into water.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3A is added to read:
Subchapter 3A. Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations
§ 1351. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Agricultural waste” means material originating or emanating from a
farm or imported onto a farm that contains sediments; minerals, including
heavy metals; plant nutrients; pesticides; organic wastes, including livestock
waste; animal mortalities; compost; feed, litter, and crop debris; waste oils;
pathogenic bacteria and viruses; thermal pollution; silage runoff; process
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 4 of 21
wastewater, untreated milk house waste; and any other farm waste as the term
“waste” is defined in subdivision 1251(12) of this chapter.
(2)(A) “Animal feeding operation” or “AFO” means a lot or facility,
other than an aquatic animal production facility, where the following
conditions are met:
(i) animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of 45 days or more in any
12-month period; and
(ii) crops, vegetation, or forage growth are not sustained in the
normal growing season over any portion of the lot or facility.
(B) Two or more individual farms qualifying as an AFO that are
under common ownership and that adjoin each other or use a common area or
system for the disposal of waste shall be considered to be a single AFO if the
combined number of livestock or domestic fowl on the combined farm
qualifies the combined farm as a large CAFO as defined in subdivision (11) of
this section or as a medium CAFO as defined in subdivision (14) of this
section.
(3) “Concentrated animal feeding operation” or “CAFO” means an AFO
that is defined as a large CAFO, a medium CAFO, or a small CAFO.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 5 of 21
(4) “Land application area” means the area under the control of an AFO
or CAFO owner or operator, whether it is owned, rented, or leased, to which
manure, litter, or process wastewater may be applied.
(5) “Large concentrated animal feeding operation” or “Large CAFO”
means an AFO that:
(A) houses 700 or more mature dairy animals, 1,000 or more cattle or
cow or calf pairs, 1,000 or more veal calves, 2,500 or more swine weighing
over 55 pounds, 10,000 or more swine weighing 55 pounds or less, 500 or
more horses, 10,000 or more sheep or lambs, 55,000 or more turkeys, 30,000
or more laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling system, 82,000
or more laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 125,000 or more
chickens other than laying hens without a liquid manure handling system,
5,000 or more ducks with a liquid manure handling system, or 30,000 or more
ducks without a liquid manure handling system; and
(B) any of the following conditions are met;
(i) wastes are discharged into waters of the United States via a
point source;
(ii) wastes are discharged directly into waters that originate
outside of or pass over, across, or through the facility or otherwise come into
direct contact with the animals confined in the operation; or
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 6 of 21
(iii) a precipitation-related discharge of manure, litter, or process
wastewater from land areas under the control of a LFO has occurred that was
not in accordance with site-specific nutrient management practices that ensure
appropriate agricultural utilization of the nutrients in the manure, litter, or
process wastewater, as determined by the Secretary.
(6) “Large farm operation” or “LFO” has the same meaning in in
6 V.S.A. chapter 215.
(7) “Manure” means livestock waste in solid or liquid form that may
also contain bedding, compost, and raw materials or other materials
commingled with manure or set aside for disposal.
(8) “Medium concentrated animal feeding operation” or “Medium
CAFO” means an AFO that:
(A) houses 200 to 699 mature dairy animals, 300 to 999 cattle or cow
or calf pairs, 300 to 999 veal calves, 750 to 2,499 swine weighing over 55
pounds, 3,000 to 9,999 swine weighing 55 pounds or less, 150 to 499 horses,
3,000 to 9,999 sheep or lambs, 16,500 to 54,999 turkeys, 9,000 to 29,999
laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling system, 25,000 to 81,999
laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 37,500 to 124,999
chickens other than laying hens without a liquid manure handling system,
1,500 to 4,999 ducks with a liquid manure handling system, or 10,000 to
29,999 ducks without a liquid manure handling system; and
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 7 of 21
(B) either of the following conditions are met;
(i) wastes are discharged into waters of the United States via a
point source; or
(ii) wastes are discharged directly into waters that originate
outside of or pass over, across, or through the facility or otherwise come into
direct contact with the animals confined in the operation.
(9) “Medium farm operation” or “MFO” has the same meaning as
medium farm operation in 6 V.S.A chapter 215 and rules adopted under the
chapter.
(10) “Point source” means any discernible, confined, and discrete
conveyance, including any pipe, ditch, channel, tunnel, conduit, well, discrete
fissure, container, rolling stock, concentrated animal feeding operation, or
vessel or other floating craft from which pollutants are or may be discharged.
This term does not include agricultural stormwater discharges and return flows
from irrigated agriculture.
(11) “Process wastewater” means water directly or indirectly used in the
operation of an AFO or CAFO for any or all of the following: spillage or
overflow from animal or poultry watering systems; washing, cleaning, or
flushing pens, barns, manure pits, or other AFO or CAFO facilities; direct
contact swimming, washing, or spray cooling of animals; or dust control.
Process wastewater also includes any water that comes into contact with any
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 8 of 21
raw materials, products, or byproducts, including manure, litter, feed, milk,
eggs, or bedding.
(12) “Production area” means that part of an AFO or CAFO that
includes the animal confinement area, the manure storage area, the raw
materials storage area, and the waste containment areas. The animal
confinement area includes open lots, housed lots, feedlots, confinement houses,
stall barns, free stall barns, milkrooms, milking centers, cowyards, barnyards,
medication pens, walkers, animal walkways, and stables. The manure storage
area includes lagoons, runoff ponds, storage sheds, stockpiles, under house or
pit storages, liquid impoundments, static piles, and composting piles. The raw
materials storage area includes feed silos, silage bunkers, and bedding
materials. The waste containment area includes settling basins, and areas
within berms and diversions that separate uncontaminated storm water. Also
included in the definition of production area is any egg washing or egg
processing facility, and any area used in the storage, handling, treatment, or
disposal of mortalities.
(13) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(14) “Small animal feeding operation” of “SFO” means an AFO that is
not a large CAFO or a medium CAFO.
(15) “Small concentrated animal feeding operation” or “small CAFO”
means a small AFO designated as a small CAFO by the Secretary upon
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 9 of 21
determining that the AFO is a significant contributor of pollutants to waters of
the State, and either of the following conditions are met:
(A) wastes are discharged into waters via a point source; or
(B) wastes are discharged directly into waters that originate outside
of or pass over, across, or through the facility or otherwise come into direct
contact with the animals confined in the operation.
(16) “Waters of the United States” shall have the same meaning as
“waters” defined by the federal regulations under the Clean Water Act.
§ 1352. POWERS OF THE SECRETARY
The Secretary has the authority to exercise all of the following:
(1) Implement the federal Clean Water Act to administer a Vermont
pollutant discharge elimination system (VPDES) CAFO program that is
consistent with and equivalent to the federal Clean Water Act and enabling
rules.
(2) Make, adopt, revise, and amend rules as necessary to administer a
VPDES CAFO program that is consistent with and equivalent to the federal
Clean Water Act and enabling rules.
(3) Make, adopt, revise, and amend procedures, guidelines, inspection
checklists, and other documents as necessary for the administration of the
CAFO VPDES program.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 10 of 21
(4) Designate any AFO that meets the definition of a CAFO as a CAFO,
in the Secretary’s sole discretion.
(5) Designate any small AFO as a CAFO if after an on-site inspection,
the Secretary determines that the small AFO is discharging into water and is a
significant contributor of pollutants to waters of the state. The Secretary shall
consider the following factors:
(A) the size of the AFO and the amount of wastes reaching waters;
(B) the location of the AFO relative to waters;
(C) the means of conveyance of animal wastes and process waste
waters into waters;
(D) the slope, vegetation, rainfall, and other factors affecting the
likelihood or frequency of discharge of animal wastes manure and process
waste waters into waters; and
(E) other relevant factors.
(6) Access private or public property to inspect AFOs, take photos and
samples, and review and copy AFO land management records, including
nutrient management plans, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of
this subchapter.
(7) Solicit and receive federal funds to implement the CAFO program.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 11 of 21
(8) Cooperate fully with the federal government or other agencies in the
operation of any joint federal-state programs concerning the regulation of
agricultural pollution.
(9) Appoint assistants or contract with persons with applicable expertise,
subject to applicable laws and state policies, to perform or assist in the
performance of the duties and functions of the Secretary under this chapter.
§ 1353. CAFO PERMIT REQUIREMENTS AND EXEMPTIONS
(a) The discharge of manure, litter, or process wastewater to waters of the
United States from a CAFO as a result of the application of that manure, litter
or process wastewater by the CAFO to land areas under its control is a
discharge from that CAFO subject to NPDES permit requirements, except
where the manure, litter, or process wastewater has been applied in accordance
with a site-specific nutrient management plan approved by the Secretary.
(b) A precipitation-related discharge of manure, litter, or process
wastewater from land areas under the control of a LFO shall be considered an
exempt agricultural stormwater discharge only where the manure, litter, or
process wastewater has been land applied in accordance with site-specific
nutrient management practices that ensure appropriate agricultural utilization
of the nutrients in the manure, litter, or process wastewater, as determined by
the Secretary.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 12 of 21
(1) All MFOs and LFOs shall maintain documentation of a nutrient
management plan and practices on site or at a nearby office and make the
documentation readily available to the Secretary upon request.
(2) SFOs shall maintain documentation of soil testing and nutrient
management practices.
(c) The presumption in 6 V.S.A. § 4810(b) that farms in compliance with
the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets’ Required Agricultural Practices
Rule are not discharging is not applicable to any AFO determined by the
Secretary’s decision to be a CAFO.
(d) Prima facie evidence sufficient to determine that a farm is a CAFO
includes: an observed discharge from a point source, evidence of a recent prior
discharge from a point sources such as a stained drainage swale and standing
water in a ditch close to waters.
Sec. 3. COMMUNITY STAKEHOLDER GROUP ON AGRICULTURAL
WATER QUALITY
(a) On or before September 1, 2025, the Secretary of Natural Resources, in
coordination with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, shall engage
key agricultural stakeholders as part of a pre-rulemaking process to gather
input on proposed concentrated animal feeding operation (CAFO) rules. The
rulemaking process also shall include public notice and informational hearings
to provide updates on the CAFO program and gather broad public input. In
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 13 of 21
addition, the stakeholder engagement process shall include specific
opportunities for the agricultural community, including livestock farmers, farm
and watershed groups, and agricultural consultants, to share their input on:
(1) the implementation of the Agency of Natural Resources’ CAFO
program;
(2) how to align the CAFO program most effectively with water quality
regulatory programs administered by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food, and
Markets;
(3) how to best create regulatory clarity for agricultural producers for
the long-term, within a two-agency regulatory system or through a full transfer
of regulatory authority to one agency;
(4) the resources, technical assistance, and regulatory structure
necessary to create a path to compliance for agricultural producers that
maintain CAFO operations; and
(5) feedback on implementing regulatory structures similar to other
states, including the New York State Department of Environmental Protection
CAFO Program.
(b) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
file a report with the House Committees on Agriculture, Food Resiliency and
Forestry and on Environment, and the Senate Committees on Agriculture and
on Natural Resources and Energy. The report shall
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 14 of 21
(1) summarize the stakeholder process, including public comment
receive;
(2) summarize public input received during rulemaking;
(3) assess whether the regulatory structure for administering agricultural
water quality requirements in the State is sufficient or whether further
structural changes, such as sole regulation by the Agency of Natural
Resources, should be implemented; and
(4) recommended any statutory amendment or other changes related to
implementation of the CAFO program and agricultural water quality regulation
more generally.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 1259 is amended to read:
§ 1259. PROHIBITIONS
(a) No person shall discharge any waste, substance, or material into waters
of the State, nor shall any person discharge any waste, substance, or material
into an injection well or discharge into a publicly owned treatment works any
waste that interferes with, passes through without treatment, or is otherwise
incompatible with those works or would have a substantial adverse effect on
those works or on water quality, without first obtaining a permit for that
discharge from the Secretary. This subsection shall not prohibit the proper
application of fertilizer to fields and crops, nor reduce or affect the authority or
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 15 of 21
policy declared in Joint House Resolution 7 of the 1971 Session of the General
Assembly.
* * *
(f) The provisions of subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section shall not
regulate Provided that the introduction of wastes are from sources that comply
with the federal Clean Water Act and federal CAFO regulation, the following
activities shall not require a VPDES permit under section 1263 of this title:
(1) required agricultural practices, as adopted by rule by the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets,; or
(2) accepted silvicultural practices, as defined by the Commissioner of
Forests, Parks and Recreation, including practices which that are in compliance
with the Acceptable Management Practices for Maintaining Water Quality on
Logging Jobs in Vermont, as adopted by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks
and Recreation; nor shall these provisions regulate discharges from
concentrated animal feeding operations that require a permit under section
1263 of this title; nor shall those provisions prohibit stormwater runoff or the
discharge of nonpolluting wastes, as defined by the Secretary.
* * *
(i) The Secretary of Natural Resources, to the extent compatible with
federal requirements, shall delegate to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets the State agricultural non-point nonpoint source pollution control
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 16 of 21
program planning, implementation, and regulation. A memorandum of
understanding shall be adopted for this purpose, which shall address
implementation grants, the distribution of federal program assistance, and the
development of land use performance standards. Prior to executing the
memorandum, the Secretary of State shall arrange for two formal publications
of information relating to the proposed memorandum. The information shall
consist of a summary of the proposal; the name, telephone number, and
address of a person able to answer questions and receive comments on the
proposal; and the deadline for receiving comments. Publication shall be subject
to the provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 839(d), (e), and (g), relating to the publication
of administrative rules This shared authority ensures comprehensive water
quality protection and implements equivalent State nonpoint source pollution
controls on farms not covered by the Clean Water Act. The Agencies shall
cooperate and share information to enable effective and consistent regulation
and enforcement. Not later than September 1, 2025, the Agency of Natural
Resources in consultation with the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency and
the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, shall issue a document that sets
forth the respective roles and responsibilities of the Agency of Natural
Resources in implementing the Clean Water Act on farms and responsibilities
of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets in implementing the State’s
complementary nonpoint source program on farms. The document will replace
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 17 of 21
the existing memorandum of understanding between the agencies. The
Secretary shall post the draft document and information regarding the
document on the Agency’s website, shall issue public notice by press release
and social media, shall submit the draft documents to the Senate Committees
on Agriculture and on Natural Resources and Energy and the House
Committees on Agriculture, Food Resiliency, and Forestry and on
Environment, and shall allow for public comment. The proposed
memorandum of understanding document shall be available for 30 days after
the final date of publication for public review and comment prior to being
executed by the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets. The Secretary of Natural Resources and in
consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets annually
shall review the memorandum of understanding the document every five years
to ensure compliance with the requirements of the Clean Water Act and the
provisions of section 1258 of this title. If the memorandum document is
substantially revised, it first shall be noticed in the same manner that applies to
the initial memorandum. Actions by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets under this section shall be consistent with the water quality standards
and water pollution control requirements of chapter 47 of this title and the
federal Clean Water Act as amended.
* * *
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 18 of 21
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 1263 is amended to read:
§ 1263. DISCHARGE PERMITS
(a) Any person who intends to discharge waste into the waters of the State
or who intends to discharge into an injection well or who intends to discharge
into any publicly owned treatment works any waste that interferes with, passes
through without treatment, or is otherwise incompatible with that works or
would have a substantial adverse effect on that works or on water quality, or is
required to apply for a CAFO permit, shall make application to the Secretary
for a discharge permit. Application shall be made on a form prescribed by the
Secretary. An applicant shall pay an application fee in accordance with
3 V.S.A. § 2822.
(b) When an application is filed under this section, the Secretary shall
proceed in accordance with chapter 170 of this title. The Secretary may
require any applicant to submit any additional information that the Secretary
considers necessary and may refuse to grant a permit, or permission to
discharge under the terms of a general permit, until the information is
furnished and evaluated.
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any Any person who owns
or operates a concentrated animal feeding operation that requires a permit
under the federal National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 19 of 21
regulations shall submit an application to the Secretary for a discharge permit
and pay the required fees specified in 3 V.S.A. § 2822. On or before July 1,
2007, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall adopt rules implementing the
federal National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit regulations for
discharges from concentrated animal feeding operations. Until such regulations
are adopted, the substantive permitting standards and criteria used by the
Secretary to evaluate applications and issue or deny discharge permits for
concentrated animal feeding operations shall be those specified by federal
regulations. The Secretary may issue an individual or general permit for these
types of discharges in accordance with the procedural requirements of
subsection (b) of this section and other State law. For the purposes of this
subsection, “concentrated animal feeding operation” means a farm that meets
the definition contained in the federal regulations Not later than December 15,
2025, the Secretary shall amend and issue the Medium CAFO General Permit
and Notice of Intent. Not later than July 1, 2026, the Secretary shall issue a
CAFO application and an individual CAFO permit. The Secretary may request
any additional information from a farm as necessary to process a permit and
administer the CAFO program. The Secretary may direct a farm to apply for
an individual or general permit in accordance with the procedural requirements
of subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 20 of 21
(h) The Secretary shall require nutrient management plans for all CAFOs
and shall include the plans in the permits for public comment in accordance
with the process set forth in 10 V.S.A. chapter 170. The Secretary may amend
a permit in accordance with 10 V.S.A. chapter 170 or revoke a permit in
accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 814.
(i) Once a CAFO is covered under a CAFO permit, the farm shall be
covered for the five year duration of the permit. A farm covered by a CAFO
permit shall renew the permit in accordance with its terms, unless the farm
wants to opt out and can demonstrate it is not discharging and shall
accordingly comply with the federal CWA and the Vermont CAFO rules.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 1264(d) is amended to read:
(d) Exemptions.
(1) No permit is required under this section for:
(A) Stormwater runoff from farms in compliance with agricultural
practices adopted by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, provided
that this and the federal Clean Water Act as determined by the Secretary of
Natural Resources. This exemption shall not apply to construction stormwater
permits required by subdivision (c)(4) of this section.
(B) Stormwater runoff from concentrated animal feeding operations
permitted under subsection 1263(g) of this chapter.
VT LEG #380450 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.100
2025 Page 21 of 21
(C) Stormwater runoff from accepted silvicultural practices, as
defined by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, including
practices that are in compliance with the federal Clean Water Act as
determined by the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Acceptable
Management Practices for Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in
Vermont, as adopted by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
(D) Stormwater runoff permitted under section 1263 of this title.
(2) No permit is required under subdivision (c)(1), (5), or (7) of this
section and for which a municipality has assumed full legal responsibility as
part of a permit issued to the municipality by the Secretary. As used in this
subdivision, “full legal responsibility” means legal control of the stormwater
system, including a legal right to access the stormwater system, a legal duty to
properly maintain the stormwater system, and a legal duty to repair and replace
the stormwater system when it no longer adequately protects waters of the
State.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380450 v.1